Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 17 Close Corporation Supplement

Law reviews. —

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act and Close Corporation Supplement,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1990).

For comment, “An Innovative Approach to Piercing the Corporate Veil: An Introduction to the Individual Factor and Cumulative Effects Analysis,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 563 (1990).

For comment, “The New Wyoming Statutory Close Corporation Supplement; Should Your Corporation Elect Statutory Close Corporation Status?,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 589 (1990).